Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-910
Livestock animal health care professional;
duty to report suspected criminal activity; immunity from liability.

(1) Any livestock
animal health care professional, while acting in his or her professional capacity
or within the scope of his or her employment, who observes or is involved
in an incident which leads the livestock animal health care professional to
reasonably suspect that a livestock animal has been abandoned, cruelly neglected,
or cruelly mistreated shall report such treatment to an entity that investigates
such reports in the appropriate jurisdiction.

(2) Nothing
in this section shall be construed to impose a duty to investigate observed
or reasonably suspected abandonment, cruel neglect, or cruel mistreatment
of a livestock animal. Any person making a report under this section is immune
from liability except for false statements of fact made with malicious intent.

(3) For purposes
of this section, a livestock animal health care professional means a licensed
veterinarian as defined in section 38-3310 or a licensed veterinary technician
as defined in section 38-3311 whose practice involves care of livestock animals.

Laws 2010, LB865, § 10.